Washington statutes.
RCW 18.104.170

Remedies cumulative.

The remedies provided for in this chapter shall be cumulative and nothing herein shall alter, abridge or foreclose alternative actions at common law or in equity or under statutory law, civil or criminal.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 212 s 17.]